test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_veeskir_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - veeskir: # MLO, ok
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: viäskár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: viäskár
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: viäskárân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: viäskárist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: viäskáráin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: viäskárttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess:   [veskirin, viäskárin]
    veeskir+N+Par:   [veskirid, viäskárid]
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: viäskáreh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: viäskárij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: viäskárijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: viäskáráid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: viäskárijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: [viäskárijguin, viäskárijgijn]
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: viäskárijttáá

  Noun - eebir: # MLO, ok
    eebir+N+Sg+Nom: [eebir, iäbbár]
    eebir+N+Sg+Gen: iäbbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Acc: iäbbár
    eebir+N+Sg+Ill: iäbbárân
    eebir+N+Sg+Loc: iäbbárist
    eebir+N+Sg+Com: iäbbáráin
    eebir+N+Sg+Abe: iäbbárttáá
    eebir+N+Ess: [ebirin, iäbbárin]
    eebir+N+Par: [ebirid, iäbbárid]
    eebir+N+Pl+Nom: iäbbáreh
    eebir+N+Pl+Gen: iäbbárij
    eebir+N+Pl+Acc: iäbbárijd
    eebir+N+Pl+Ill: iäbbáráid
    eebir+N+Pl+Loc: iäbbárijn
    eebir+N+Pl+Com: [iäbbárijguin, iäbbárijgijn]
    eebir+N+Pl+Abe: iäbbárijttáá
